California statutes. Education Code
(l) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 81, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Qualifications for Community College Personnel [87350. - 87360.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [87350. - 87351.]

87350.

The plan for a new mechanism of faculty qualifications being developed by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges pursuant to Chapter 1465 of the Statutes of 1986 shall include all of the following:

(a) A transition provision which would grandfather existing bargaining unit definitions.

(b) Consideration of projected California demographics.

(c) Consideration of affirmative action policies and programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 28.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87351.

The minimum qualifications for service prescribed by this chapter shall become operative on July 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 31.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Minimum Qualifications and Hiring Criteria [87355. - 87359.5.]

87355.

Notwithstanding Section 87356, every person authorized to serve as a community college instructor, librarian, counselor, student personnel worker, supervisor, administrator, or chief administrative officer under a credential shall retain the right to serve under the terms of that credential, and, for that purpose, shall be deemed to possess the minimum qualifications specified for every discipline or service covered by the credential until the expiration of that credential. The board of governors shall adopt regulations as necessary to implement this requirement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1340, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

87356.

(a) The board of governors shall adopt regulations to establish and maintain the minimum qualifications for service as a faculty member teaching credit instruction, a faculty member teaching noncredit instruction, a librarian, a counselor, an educational administrator, an extended opportunity programs and services worker, a disabled students programs and services worker, an apprenticeship instructor, and a supervisor of health.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that this section does not create a state-mandated local program because compensation of faculty will continue to be determined through the collective bargaining process or meet and confer sessions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

87357.

(a) In establishing and maintaining minimum qualifications pursuant to Section 87356, the board of governors shall do all of the following:

(1) With regard to minimum qualifications for faculty, the board of governors shall consult with, and rely primarily on the advice and judgment of, the statewide Academic Senate. With regard to minimum qualifications for educational administrators, the board of governors shall consult with, and rely primarily on the advice and judgment of, an appropriate statewide organization of administrators. With regard to minimum qualifications for apprenticeship instructors, the board of governors shall consult with, and rely primarily on the advice and judgment of, appropriate apprenticeship teaching faculty and labor organization representatives. In each case, the board of governors shall provide a reasonable opportunity for comment by other statewide representative groups.

(2) The board of governors shall establish a process to review at least every three years the continued appropriateness of the minimum qualifications, and the adequacy of the means by which they are administered. The process shall provide for the appointment of a representative group of community college faculty, administrators, students, and trustees to conduct or otherwise assist in the review, including particularly, representatives of academic senates, collective bargaining organizations, and statewide faculty associations. In addition, the group shall be broadly representative of academic and vocational programs in the curriculum from both urban and rural districts, and representative of ethnic minority communities.

(b) The board of governors, relying primarily upon the advice and judgment of the statewide Academic Senate, shall prescribe by regulation a working definition of the term “discipline” and shall prepare and maintain a list of disciplines that are “reasonably related” to one another, as that phrase is used in the minimum qualifications. The initial list shall be distributed to the community college districts by July 1, 1989, for their use in applying the minimum qualifications for hire.

In formulating advice and recommendations to the board of governors regarding the definition of the term “discipline,” the statewide Academic Senate shall consult with appropriate statewide organizations representing administrators and faculty collective bargaining agents. The statewide Academic Senate shall incorporate the advice of those groups into its recommendations to the board of governors, particularly as it relates to the practical ramifications of any proposed definition of the term “discipline” on issues of reassignment, transfer, and reduction in force.

The board of governors, relying primarily upon the advice and judgment of the statewide Academic Senate, shall prepare and maintain a list of disciplines in which the master’s degree is not generally expected or available. The initial list shall be distributed to the community college districts by July 1, 1989, for their use in applying the minimum qualifications for service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 33.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87358.

The board of governors shall periodically designate a team of community college faculty, administrators, and trustees to review each community college district’s application of minimum qualifications to faculty and administrators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 28.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87359.

The board of governors shall adopt regulations setting forth a process authorizing local governing boards to employ faculty members and educational administrators who do not meet the applicable minimum qualifications specified in the regulations adopted by the board of governors pursuant to Section 87356. Unless and until amended pursuant to the process described in Section 87357, the regulations shall require all of the following:

(a) No one may be hired to serve as a community college faculty member or educational administrator under the authority granted by the regulations unless the governing board determines that he or she possesses qualifications that are at least equivalent to the minimum qualifications specified in regulations of the board of governors adopted pursuant to Section 87356. The criteria used by the governing board in making the determination shall be reflected in the governing board’s action employing the individual.

(b) The process, as well as criteria and standards by which the governing board reaches its determinations regarding faculty members, shall be developed and agreed upon jointly by representatives of the governing board and the academic senate, and approved by the governing board. The agreed upon process shall include reasonable procedures to ensure that the governing board relies primarily upon the advice and judgment of the academic senate to determine that each individual faculty member employed under the authority granted by the regulations possesses qualifications that are at least equivalent to the applicable minimum qualifications specified in regulations adopted by the board of governors. The process shall further require that the governing board provide the academic senate with an opportunity to present its views to the governing board before the board makes a determination, and that the written record of the decision, including the views of the academic senate, shall be available for review pursuant to Section 87358.

(c) Until a joint agreement is reached and approved pursuant to subdivision (b), the district process in existence on January 1, 1989, shall remain in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 506, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

87359.2.

(a) The instructor of record for a course of instruction shall be a person who meets the minimum qualifications to serve as a faculty member teaching credit instruction or a faculty member teaching noncredit instruction established pursuant to Section 87356 or the qualifications to serve as a faculty member established pursuant to Section 87359.

(b) A community college instructor, librarian, counselor, student personnel worker, supervisor, administrator, chief administrative officer, extended opportunity programs and services worker, disabled students programs and services worker, apprenticeship instructor, or supervisor of health shall be a person who meets the minimum qualifications
 to serve in that position established pursuant to Sections 87355 and 87356 or the qualifications to serve in that position established pursuant to Section 87359.

(c) This section does not prohibit community college staff from using artificial intelligence tools to assist in the operations of a community college or in providing services to community college students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   (SB 241)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

87359.5.

By May 1, 1989, the board of governors shall have reviewed or contracted for review of, the job relevance of the requirements of Sections 87408, 87408.5, 87408.6, and any other physical fitness tests or examinations, and other conditions of employment, applicable to community college personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 28.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hiring Criteria [87360. - 87360.]

87360.

(a) In establishing hiring criteria for faculty and administrators, district governing boards shall, no later than July 1, 1990, develop criteria that include a sensitivity to and understanding of the diverse academic, socioeconomic, cultural, disability, and ethnic backgrounds of community college students. 

(b) No later than July 1, 1990, hiring criteria, policies, and procedures for new faculty members shall be developed and agreed upon jointly by representatives of the governing board, and the academic senate, and approved by the governing board.

(c) Until a joint agreement is reached and approved pursuant to subdivision (b), the existing district process in existence on January 1, 1989, shall remain in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 28.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Employment [87400. - 87894.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [87400. - 87489.]

87400.

Governing boards of community college districts shall employ for academic positions, only persons who possess the qualifications therefor prescribed by regulation of the board of governors. It is contrary to the public policy of this state for any person or persons charged, by those governing boards, with the responsibility of recommending persons for employment by those boards to refuse or to fail to do so for reasons of race, color, religious creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, or national origin of those applicants for that employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 637, Sec. 10.   (AB 620)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

87405.

(a) Governing boards of commmunity college districts shall not employ or retain in employment persons who have been convicted of any sex offense as defined in Section 87010 or controlled substance offense as defined in Section 87011. If, however, any such conviction is reversed and the person is acquitted of the offense in a new trial or the charges against him or her are dismissed, this section does not prohibit his or her employment thereafter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no person shall be denied employment or not be retained solely on the basis that he or she has been convicted of a sex offense or a controlled substance offense if he or she has obtained or applied for a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, and if his or her probation has been terminated and the information or accusation has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person may be employed or retained despite being convicted of a sex offense or a controlled substance offense if the governing board determines from the evidence presented that the person has been rehabilitated for at least five years, or has received a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, or if the accusation or information against the person has been dismissed and he or she has been released from all disabilities and penalties resulting from the offense pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 37.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87406.

Governing boards of community college districts shall not employ or retain in employment any person who has been determined to be a sexual psychopath under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 5500), Chapter 1, Part 1.5, Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or under similar provisions of law of any other state. If, however, the determination is reversed and the person is determined not to be a sexual psychopath in a new proceeding or the proceeding to determine whether he or she is a sexual psychopath is dismissed, this section does not prohibit his or her employment thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 38.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87406.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing board of any community college district may employ any student enrolled in the district who is an ex-convict or who is on parole, other than a person determined to be a sexual psychopath, to perform noninstructional duties and such student workers shall not be considered to be classified employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 345.)
-------------------------------------------

87408.

(a) When a community college district wishes to employ a person in an academic position and that person has not previously been employed in an academic position in this state, the district shall require a medical certificate showing that the applicant is free from any communicable disease, including, but not limited to, active tuberculosis, unfitting the applicant to instruct or associate with students. The medical certificate shall be submitted directly to the governing board by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a commissioned medical officer exempted from
 licensure. The medical examination shall have been conducted not more than six months before the submission of the certificate and shall be at the expense of the applicant. A governing board may offer a contract of employment to an applicant subject to the submission of the required medical certificate. Notwithstanding Section 87031, the medical certificate shall become a part of the personnel record of the employee and shall be open to the employee or his or her designee.

(b) The governing board of a community college district may require academic employees to undergo a periodic medical examination by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a commissioned medical officer exempted from licensure, to determine that the employee is free from any communicable
 disease, including, but not limited to, active tuberculosis, unfitting the applicant to instruct or associate with students. The periodic medical examination shall be at the expense of the district. The medical certificate shall become a part of the personnel record of the employee and shall be open to the employee or his or her designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 512, Sec. 9.   (SB 1069)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

87408.5.

(a) When a community college district wishes to employ a retirant who is retired for service, and such person has not been previously employed as a retirant, such district shall require, as a condition of initial employment as a retirant, a medical certificate showing that the retirant is free from any disabling disease unfitting him or her to instruct or associate with students. The medical certificate shall be completed and submitted directly to the community college district by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a commissioned medical officer exempted from
 licensure. A medical examination shall be required for the completion of the medical certificate. The examination shall be conducted not more than six months before the completion and submission of the certificate and shall be at the expense of the retirant. The medical certificate shall become a part of the personnel record of the employee and shall be open to the employee or his or her designee.

(b) The community college district that initially employed the retirant, or any district that subsequently employs the retirant, may require a periodic medical examination by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a commissioned medical officer exempted from licensure, to determine that the retirant is free from any communicable disease unfitting him or her to instruct
 or associate with students. The periodic medical examination shall be at the expense of the community college district. The medical certificate shall become a part of the personnel record of the retirant and shall be open to the retirant or his or her designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 512, Sec. 10.   (SB 1069)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

87408.6.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (h), a person shall not be initially employed by a community college district in an academic or classified position unless the person has within the last 60 days submitted to
 a tuberculosis risk assessment developed by the State Department of Public Health and the California Tuberculosis Controllers Association and, if risk factors are present, an examination to determine that he or she is free of active tuberculosis, by a physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code. This examination shall consist of an approved intradermal tuberculin test or any other test for tuberculosis infection recommended by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and licensed by the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA), that, if positive, shall be followed by an X-ray of the lungs.

(2) The X-ray film may be taken by a competent and qualified X-ray technician if the X-ray film is subsequently interpreted by a physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) The district superintendent, or his or her designee, may exempt, for a period not to exceed 60 days following termination of the pregnancy, a pregnant employee from the requirement that a positive intradermal tuberculin test be followed by an X-ray of the
 lungs.

(b) Thereafter, employees who are skin test negative, or negative by any other test recommended by the CDC and licensed by the FDA, or were not tested because of a lack of risk factors, shall be required to undergo the foregoing tuberculosis risk assessment and, if risk factors exist, examination at least once each four years or more often if directed by the governing board upon recommendation of the local health officer for so long as the employee remains test negative by either the tuberculin skin test or any other test recommended by the CDC and licensed by the FDA. Once an employee has a documented positive skin test or any other test that has been recommended by the CDC and licensed by the FDA that has been followed by
 an X-ray, the foregoing tuberculosis risk assessments and examinations shall no longer be required, and referral shall be made within 30 days of completion of the examination to the local health officer to determine the need for followup care.

(c) If risk factors were present at the tuberculosis risk assessment and an examination occurs, after the examination an employee shall cause to be on file with the district superintendent a
 certificate from the examining physician and surgeon or physician assistant showing the employee was examined and found free from active tuberculosis. “Certificate,” as used in this subdivision, means a certificate signed by the examining physician and surgeon or physician assistant, or a notice from a public health agency or unit of the American Lung Association that indicates freedom from active tuberculosis. The latter, regardless of form, shall constitute evidence of compliance with this section.

(d) This tuberculosis risk assessment and, if risk factors are present,
 examination is a condition of initial employment and the expense incident thereto shall be borne by the applicant unless otherwise provided by rules of the governing board. However, the board may, if an applicant is accepted for employment, reimburse the person in a like manner prescribed for employees in subdivision (e).

(e) The governing board of each district shall reimburse the employee for the cost, if any, of the examination. The board may provide for the examination required by this section or may establish a reasonable fee for the examination that is reimbursable to employees of the district complying with this section.

(f) (1) At the discretion of the governing board, this section does not apply to those employees not requiring certification qualifications who are employed for any period of time less than a college year whose functions do not require frequent or prolonged contact with students.

(2) The governing board may, however, require the
 tuberculosis risk assessment and, if risk factors are present, examination and may, as a contract condition, require the assessment and examination of persons employed under contract, other than those persons specified in subdivision (a), if the board believes the presence of these persons in and around college premises would constitute a health hazard to students.

(g) If the governing board of a community college district determines by resolution, after hearing, that the health of students in the district would not be jeopardized thereby, this section does not apply to any employee of the district who
 files an affidavit stating that he or she adheres to the faith or teachings of any well-recognized religious sect, denomination, or organization and in accordance with its creed, tenets, or principles depends for healing upon prayer in the practice of religion and that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief he or she is free from active tuberculosis. If at any time there should be probable cause to believe that the affiant is afflicted with active tuberculosis, he or she may be excluded from service until the governing board of the employing district is satisfied that he or she is not so afflicted.

(h) (1) A person who transfers his or her employment from one campus or community college district to another shall be deemed to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) if the person can produce a certificate that
 shows that he or she
 within the past four years had a tuberculosis risk assessment that showed no risk factors were present or was examined and was found to be free of communicable tuberculosis, or if it is verified by the college previously employing him or her that it has a certificate on file that contains that showing.

(2) A person who transfers his or her employment from a private or parochial elementary school, secondary school, or nursery school to the community college district subject to this section shall be deemed
 to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) if the person can produce a certificate as provided for in Section 121525 of the Health and Safety Code that shows that he or she
 within the last four years had a tuberculosis risk assessment that showed no risk factors were present or was examined and was found to be free of communicable tuberculosis, or if it is verified by the school previously employing him or her that it has the certificate on file.

(i) (1) Any governing board of a community college district providing for the transportation of students under contract shall require as a condition of the contract the tuberculosis risk assessment and, if risk factors are present, examination for active tuberculosis, as provided in
 subdivision (a), of all drivers transporting the
 students. Privately contracted drivers who transport the students on an infrequent basis, not to exceed once a month, shall be excluded from this requirement.

(2) Examinations required pursuant to this subdivision shall be made available without charge by the local health officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   (SB 1038)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

87410.

Any academic employee not a regular employee who fails to signify his acceptance within 45 consecutive calendar days after notice of his or her election or employment has been given him or her, or mailed to him or her by United States registered mail with postage thereon prepaid at his or her last known place of address, by the clerk or secretary of the governing board of the community college district, shall be deemed to have declined the employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 42.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87411.

If, without good cause, a regular employee of a community college district fails prior to July 1st of any college year to notify the governing board of the district of his or her intention to remain or not to remain in the service of the district, as the case may be, during the ensuing college year if a request to give that notice, including a copy of this section, was personally served upon the employee, or mailed to him or her by United States certified mail with return receipt requested to his or her last known place of address, by the clerk or secretary of the governing board of the community college district, not later than the preceding May 30th, the employee may be deemed to have declined employment and his or her services as an employee of the district may be terminated on June 30th of that year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87413.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 87415 to 87424, inclusive, every contract or regular employee employed before July 1, 1947, shall be deemed to have been employed on the date upon which he or she first accepted employment in a probationary position.

In case two or more employees accepted employment on the same date, the governing board of the district shall determine the order of employment by lots drawn by the employees concerned or assigned at random by an independent auditing firm employed in accordance with Section 87414.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 139.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87414.

Every contract or regular employee employed after June 30, 1947, shall be deemed to have been employed on the date upon which he or she first rendered paid service in a probationary or contract position.

Every academic employee who first rendered paid service on the same date shall participate in a single drawing to determine the order of employment, except that in community college districts having a full-time equivalent student in excess of 15,000, an independent auditing firm may be employed to assign to those employees numbers at random which shall determine the order of employment. Any determination of an employee’s order of employment pursuant to this section shall be made within 30 days of the date service was first rendered by the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 140.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87415.

The following general provisions shall apply regardless of date of employment:

The order once determined by lot shall be permanent, and shall be entered on the permanent records of the district.

Records showing date of employment, whether kept by the district or by the county, shall be accessible, on demand, to any academic employee of the district or to his or her designated representative.

In the absence of records as to any of the matters referred to in the two preceding sections, the board, in accordance with evidence presented, shall determine the order of employment after giving employees a reasonable opportunity to present such evidence.

The governing board of every community college district shall establish the order of employment of all contract or regular employees of the district in the manner prescribed by Sections 87400 to 87424, inclusive, and shall keep a roster of same as a public record.

Whether or not a roster is kept in other districts, the order of employment in all districts, when required, shall be determined as prescribed by Sections 87400 to 87424, inclusive.

The board shall have power and it shall be its duty to correct any errors discovered from time to time in its records showing the order of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 45.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87416.

When any college or part thereof shall have been transferred from one community college district to another, employment for any employees who transfer with the college or part thereof shall date from the time those employees first accepted employment (if before July 1, 1947) or rendered paid service (if after June 30, 1947) as contract employees in the district from which the college or part thereof and the employees were transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 46.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87417.

When any academic employee shall have resigned or been dismissed for cause and shall thereafter have been reemployed by the board, his or her date of employment shall be deemed to be the date on which he or she first accepted reemployment (if reemployed before July 1, 1947) or rendered paid service (if reemployed after June 30, 1947) after his or her reemployment.

When an employee’s services are terminated for lack of enrollment or discontinuance of service or are otherwise interrupted in a manner declared by law not to constitute a break in service, his or her original order of employment shall stand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 47.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87418.

Nothing in Section 72400, Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000), Article 5 (commencing with Section 32340) of Chapter 3 of Part 19, of Division 1 of Title 1 and this part, shall be construed in a manner to deprive any person of his or her rights and remedies in a court of competent jurisdiction on a question of law and fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 141.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87419.

Nothing in Section 72400, Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000), Article 5 (commencing with Section 32340) of Chapter 3 of Part 19, of Division 1 of Title 1 and this part, shall be construed to repeal or negate any provisions concerning employees of community college districts contained in the charter of any city, county, or city and county, adopted and approved in conformity with Article XI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 142.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87419.1.

Notwithstanding Section 87419, and notwithstanding provisions of the charter of any city or city and county to the contrary, on and after July 1, 1978, the academic employees of any community college district governed by the charter who serve as the head of a department of the district or in an administrative or supervisory position shall neither acquire nor retain permanent status in that position unless the employee is or becomes eligible for permanent status in accordance with provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 48.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87420.

All employments made under Sections 87405 to 87451, inclusive, Sections 87454 to 87462, inclusive, Section 87464, Sections 87468 to 87480, inclusive, or Sections 87600 to 87626, inclusive, shall be subordinate to the right of the Legislature to amend or repeal Sections 87405 to 87451, inclusive, Sections 87454 to 87462, inclusive, Section 87464, Sections 87468 to 87480, inclusive, Sections 87600 to 87626 inclusive, or any provision or provisions thereof at any time, and nothing herein contained shall be construed to confer upon any person employed pursuant to the provisions hereof a contract that will be impaired by the amendment or repeal of Sections 87405 to 87451, inclusive, Sections 87454 to 87462, inclusive, Section 87464, Sections 87468 to 87480, inclusive, and Sections 87600 to 87626, inclusive, or of any provision or provisions thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87421.

Nothing in this code shall be construed as prohibiting the employment of persons in academic positions for less than a full school year in temporary schools or classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 50.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87422.

Any agreement between the governing board of a community college district and authorities of any foreign country, or of any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or of any other district within the state, for the temporary exchange of academic employees, shall be for a period not to exceed three years. No exchange shall be made without the consent of the academic employees to be exchanged.

No person may serve as an exchange employee of a community college district in the state unless he or she or is qualified for service under Section 87355, 87356, or 87359.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 51.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87423.

Acceptance of any exchange position by an employee of a community college district in the state shall not affect his or her right to the permanent classification to which he or she is entitled, at the time of the acceptance, or any of his or her rights under the state teachers’ retirement salary provisions of this code, or under any local or district retirement plan, or system. The time served in the exchange position shall be counted as time served in the service of the district in which the employee is employed immediately prior to acceptance of the exchange position in determining his or her status under Section 72400, Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000), Article 5 (commencing with Section 32340) of Chapter 3 of Part 19, this part, under the provisions of this code relating to state retirement salary, and under any local or district retirement plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 144.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87424.

If the employee from the district within the state who serves as an exchange instructor without the state and the governing board regularly employing him or her so agree, the district may pay his or her regular salary, making all deductions provided by law for retirement purposes, during the period of the exchange teaching. In such case, the district shall not pay the salary of the exchange employee from without the state, serving the district in exchange for its regular instructor.

In the event an employee from a district within this state serving as an exchange instructor without the state and to whom the governing board of such district is paying the regular salary of such instructor as herein provided, is compelled to absent himself or herself from his or her duties because of injury, illness, or quarantine, the governing board of the district within this state may pay the substitute employed to take the place of such instructor and shall deduct the amount so paid the substitute from the compensation of the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

87428.

No community college district may adopt or maintain any rule or regulation which requires a candidate for an academic position to be a resident of the district or to become a resident of the district, or which requires that an employee maintain residency within the district; nor may a district grant any preferential treatment to candidates or employees because they are residents of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 52.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87436.

Any librarian when employed full time as librarian or serving full time, partly as librarian and partly as an instructor, shall rank as an instructor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87448.
